Illinois, session 104th, HB2695.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Human 5Services Equitable Pay Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "BIPOC" means people who are members of the groups 8described in subparagraphs (a) through (e) of paragraph (1) of 9subsection (A) of Section 2 of the Business Enterprise for 10Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.11    "Department" means the Department of Human Services. 12    "Grant" means an award to fund a project or program to a 13human services provider.14    "Human services provider" means a community-based human 15services organization with a human services program funded by 16a State agency.17    "Professional" means an individual employed by a human 18services agency that contracts with, is grant-funded, or 19receives funding from a State agency for the purposes of 20providing direct or indirect services that ensure that 21individuals have the essential elements to build and maintain 22physical, emotional, and economic well-being at every phase of 23life.  HB2695- 2 -LRB104 07765 KTG 17810 b1    "Rate" means the reimbursement rate paid by a State agency 2to a human services provider to deliver services to clients on 3the State's behalf.4    "State agency" means the Department of Human Services.  5    Section 10. Human Services Compensation Study. 6    (a) The Department of Human Services shall commission a 7Human Services Compensation Study on the rate of compensation, 8including wages and benefits, of positions funded by the 9Department and how they compare to similar positions in the 10human services sector in Illinois and nationally.11    (b) The study shall include an analysis of wage and 12benefit levels in different settings and for different 13education levels, including a comparison of compensation for:14        (1) State employees;15        (2) human service providers; and16        (3) for-profit private sector employees with similar 17    roles and titles.18    (c) The study's analysis shall disaggregate wage and 19benefit levels in different settings based on the race or 20ethnicity of the executive director of the institution.21    (d) The study shall identify and draw equivalencies 22between common roles or titles at community-based 23organizations and the State of Illinois.24    (e) The study shall be completed and submitted to the 25Human Services Compensation Task Force by June 30, 2026.   HB2695- 3 -LRB104 07765 KTG 17810 b1    Section 15. Human Services Compensation Task Force. 2    (a) Task Force membership.3        (1) On or before December 31, 2025, the Department of 4    Human Services shall establish the Human Services 5    Compensation Task Force. Members of the Task Force shall 6    be appointed by the Governor, and shall include the 7    following:8            (A) Two representatives of the Department of Human 9        Services.10            (B) A representative of a statewide organization 11        representing cross-sector human services providers.12            (C) Two representatives of statewide organizations 13        representing human services providers.14            (D) Two representatives of human services 15        providers that have annual budgets of $10,000,000 or 16        higher.17            (E) Two representatives of human services 18        providers that have annual budgets under $10,000,000.19            (F) One representative of a trade or labor union 20        representing professionals employed by human services 21        providers.22            (G) Two human service professionals.23        (2) Members of the Task Force shall include at least 3 24    BIPOC executive directors of community-based human service 25    organizations, overlapping with members appointed under   HB2695- 4 -LRB104 07765 KTG 17810 b1    subparagraphs (D) through (G) of paragraph (1).2        (3) The Task Force shall have 2 co-chairs, one from 3    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) and one from 4    subparagraphs (D) through (G) of paragraph (1).5    (b) On or before December 1, 2026, the Task Force shall 6provide a report to the General Assembly and the Governor's 7Office of Management and Budget that includes:8        (1) recommendations on how to strengthen recruitment 9    and retention of human services workers employed by human 10    services providers that have contracts with the State;11        (2) recommended rate levels as informed by the 12    findings to address any wage and benefit disparities 13    between different settings as may be established in the 14    Human Services Compensation Study; and15        (3) a proposed schedule to increase rates to the 16    recommended rate levels described in paragraph (2) by July 17    1, 2030.18    (c) On or before July 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, 19the State agency shall submit a report to the Task Force and 20the General Assembly that includes the following information:21        (1) the current disparity amount between the salaries 22    of professionals employed by human services providers in 23    the Department and comparable employees contracted with 24    the State agency for the delivery of human services and 25    compensation levels found to be necessary to strengthen 26    recruitment and retention of human services workers;  HB2695- 5 -LRB104 07765 KTG 17810 b1        (2) the amount of annual increases in the rate of 2    reimbursement and grant amounts to human services 3    providers under contract with the State agency that is 4    necessary to reduce and eliminate the disparity amount by 5    July 1, 2029 and in accordance with the recommendations 6    proposed by the Task Force under paragraph (3) of 7    subsection (b);8        (3) the amount needed to be annually appropriated to 9    the State agency in order to reduce the disparity amount 10    in accordance with the recommendations proposed by the 11    Task Force under paragraph (3) of subsection (b); and12        (4) records of the total amount paid by the State 13    agency in the most recent fiscal year to human services 14    providers, both individually and collectively, for the 15    purpose of strengthening and improving the compensation 16    levels of their employees. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.